California statutes. Insurance Code
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the practice of telehealth as a legitimate means by which an individual may receive health care services from a health care provider without in-person contact with the health care provider.

(c) A health insurer shall not require that in-person contact occur between a health care provider and a patient before payment is made for the services appropriately provided through telehealth, subject to the terms and conditions of the contract
 entered into between the policyholder or contractholder and the insurer, and between the insurer and its participating providers or provider groups, and pursuant to Section 10123.855.

(d) A health insurer shall not limit the type of setting where services are provided for the patient or by the health care provider before payment is made for the covered services appropriately provided by telehealth, subject to the terms and conditions of the contract between the policyholder or contractholder and the insurer, and between the insurer and its participating providers or provider groups, and pursuant to Section 10123.855.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, this section does not authorize a health insurer to require the use of telehealth if the health care provider has determined that it
 is not appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 867, Sec. 4.   (AB 744)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.855.

(a) (1) A contract between a health insurer and a health care provider for an alternative rate of payment pursuant to Section 10133 shall specify that the health insurer shall reimburse the treating or consulting health care provider for the diagnosis, consultation, or treatment of an insured or policyholder appropriately delivered through telehealth services on the same basis and to the same extent that the health insurer is responsible for reimbursement for the same service through in-person diagnosis, consultation, or treatment.

(2) This section does not limit the ability of a health insurer and a health care provider to negotiate the rate of reimbursement for a health care service provided pursuant to a contract subject to this section.
 Services that are the same, as determined by the provider’s description of the service on the claim, shall be reimbursed at the same rate whether provided in person or through telehealth. When negotiating a rate of reimbursement for telehealth services for which no in-person equivalent exists, a health insurer and the provider shall ensure the rate is consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 10123.137.

(b) (1) A policy of health insurance that provides benefits through contracts with providers at alternative rates of payment shall specify that the health insurer shall provide coverage for health care services appropriately delivered through telehealth services on the same basis and to the same extent that the health insurer is responsible for coverage for the same service through in-person diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. Coverage shall not be limited only to services delivered by select third-party corporate
 telehealth providers.

(2) This section does not alter the existing statutory or regulatory obligations of a health insurer to ensure that insureds have access to all covered services through an adequate network of contracted providers, as required by Sections 10133 and 10133.5 and the regulations promulgated thereunder.

(3) This section does not require a health insurer to deliver health care services through telehealth services.

(4) This section does not require a health insurer to cover telehealth services provided by an out-of-network provider, unless coverage is required under other provisions of law.

(c) A health insurer may offer a policy containing a copayment or coinsurance requirement for a health care service delivered through telehealth
 services, provided that the copayment or coinsurance does not exceed the copayment or coinsurance applicable if the same services were delivered through in-person diagnosis, consultation, or treatment. This subdivision does not require cost sharing for services provided through telehealth.

(d) Services provided through telehealth and covered pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the same deductible and annual or lifetime dollar maximum as equivalent services that are not provided through telehealth.

(e) The definitions in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code apply to this section.

(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications
 that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 439, Sec. 6.   (AB 457)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.856.

(a) If a health insurer offers a service via telehealth to an insured through a third-party corporate telehealth provider, all of the following conditions shall be met:

(1) The health insurer shall disclose to the insured in any promotion or coordination of the service both of the following:

(A) The availability of receiving the service on an in-person basis or via telehealth, if available, from the insured’s primary care provider, treating specialist, or from another contracting individual health professional, a contracting clinic, or a contracting health facility consistent with the service and existing timeliness and geographic access standards in Section 10133.5 and
 regulations promulgated thereunder.

(B) If the insured has coverage for out-of-network benefits, a reminder of the availability of receiving the service either via telehealth or on an in-person basis using the insured’s out-of-network benefits, and the cost sharing obligation for out-of-network benefits compared to in-network benefits and balance billing protections for services received from contracted providers.

(2) After being notified pursuant to paragraph (1), the insured chooses to receive the service via telehealth through a third-party corporate telehealth provider.

(3) The insured consents to the service consistent with Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) If the insured is currently receiving specialty telehealth services
 for a mental or behavioral health condition, the insured is given the option of continuing to receive that service with the contracting individual health professional, a contracting clinic, or a contracting health facility.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Contracting individual health professional” means a physician and surgeon or other professional who is licensed by the state to deliver or furnish health care services, including mental or behavioral health services, and who is contracted with the insured’s health insurer. A “contracting individual health professional” shall not include a dentist licensed pursuant to the Dental Practice Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code). Application of this definition is not precluded by a contracting individual health professional’s
 affiliation with a group.

(2) “Contracting clinic” means a clinic, as defined in Section 1200 of the Health and Safety Code, that is contracted with the insured’s health insurer.

(3) “Contracting health facility” mean a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, that is contracted with the insured’s health insurer.

(4) “Third-party corporate telehealth provider” means a corporation directly contracted with a health insurer that provides health care services exclusively through a telehealth technology platform and has no physical location at which a patient can receive services.

(c) If services are provided to an insured through a third-party corporate telehealth provider, a health insurer shall comply with all of the
 following:

(1) Notify the insured of the insured’s right to access the insured’s medical records pursuant to, and consistent with, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 123100) of Part 1 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Notify the insured that the record of any services provided to the insured through a third-party corporate telehealth provider shall be shared with the insured’s primary care provider, unless the insured objects.

(3) Ensure that the records are entered into a patient record system shared with the insured’s primary care provider or are otherwise provided to the insured’s primary care provider, unless the insured objects, in a manner consistent with state and federal law.

(4) Notify the insured that all services received
 through the third-party corporate telehealth provider are considered to be in network available at in-network cost-sharing and out-of-pocket costs shall accrue to any applicable deductible or out-of-pocket maximum.

(d) A health insurer shall include in its reports submitted to the department pursuant to Section 10133.5 and regulations adopted pursuant to that section, in a manner specified by the commissioner, all of the following for each product type:

(1) By specialty, the total number of services delivered via telehealth provided by third-party corporate telehealth providers.

(2) The names of each third-party corporate telehealth provider contracted with the insurer and, for each, the number of services provided by specialty.

(3) For each third-party
 corporate telehealth provider with which it contracts, the percentage of the third-party corporate telehealth provider’s contracted providers available to the insurer’s insured that are also contracting individual health professionals.

(4) For each third-party corporate telehealth provider with which it contracts, the types of telehealth services utilized by insureds, including frequency of use, gender, age, and any other information as determined by the department.

(5) For each enrollee that has accessed services for a third-party corporate telehealth provider, enrollee demographic data, including gender and age, and any other information as determined by the department.

(e) The commissioner shall investigate and take enforcement action, as appropriate, against a health insurer that fails to comply with these
 requirements and shall periodically evaluate contracts between health insurers and third-party corporate telehealth providers to determine if any audit, evaluation, or enforcement actions should be undertaken by the commissioner.

(f) This section shall not apply when an insured seeks services directly from a third-party corporate telehealth provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 439, Sec. 7.   (AB 457)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.857.

(a) A health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy covering dental services, including a specialized health insurance policy covering dental services that offers a service via telehealth to an insured through a third-party corporate telehealth provider shall report to the department, in a manner specified by the department, all of the following for each product type:

(1) The total number of services delivered via telehealth by a third-party corporate telehealth provider.

(2) For each third-party corporate telehealth provider with which it contracts, the percentage of the third-party telehealth provider’s contracted
 providers available to the insurer’s insured that are also
 network providers.

(3) For each third-party corporate telehealth provider with which it contracts, the types of telehealth services utilized by insureds, including information on the gender and age of the insured, and any other information as determined by the department.

(b) A health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy covering dental services, including a specialized health care policy covering dental services that offers a service via telehealth to an insured through a third-party corporate telehealth provider, shall disclose to the insured the impact of third-party telehealth visits on the insured’s benefit limitations, including frequency limitations and the insured’s annual maximum.

(c) Section 10123.856 shall not apply to specialized health insurance policies covering dental services.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “third-party corporate telehealth provider” means a corporation that provides dental services exclusively through a telehealth technology platform and has no physical location at which a patient can receive services, and is directly contracted with a health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy, including a specialized health insurance policy, that covers dental services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 444, Sec. 5.   (SB 577)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.86.

(a) Every policy of disability insurance covering hospital, surgical, or medical expenses that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 1999, that provides coverage for surgical procedures known as mastectomies and lymph node dissections, shall do all of the following:

(1) Allow the length of a hospital stay associated with those procedures to be determined by the attending physician and surgeon in consultation with the patient, postsurgery, consistent with sound clinical principles and processes. No disability insurer shall require a treating physician and surgeon to receive prior
 approval in determining the length of hospital stay following those procedures.

(2) Cover prosthetic devices or reconstructive surgery, including devices or surgery to restore and achieve symmetry for the patient incident to the mastectomy. Coverage for prosthetic devices and reconstructive surgery shall be subject to the deductible and coinsurance conditions applicable to other benefits.

(3) Cover all complications from a mastectomy, including lymphedema.

(b) As used in this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Coverage for prosthetic devices or reconstructive surgery” means any initial and subsequent reconstructive surgeries or prosthetic
 devices, and followup care deemed necessary by the attending physician and surgeon.

(2) “Prosthetic devices” means and includes the provision of initial and subsequent prosthetic devices pursuant to an order of the patient’s physician and surgeon.

(3) “Mastectomy” means the removal of all or part of the breast for medically necessary reasons, as determined by a licensed physician and surgeon. Partial removal of a breast includes, but is not limited to, lumpectomy, which includes surgical removal of the tumor with clear margins.

(4) “To restore and achieve symmetry” means that, in addition to coverage of prosthetic devices and reconstructive surgery for the diseased breast on which the mastectomy was performed, prosthetic
 devices and reconstructive surgery for a healthy breast is also covered if, in the opinion of the attending physician and surgeon, this surgery is necessary to achieve normal symmetrical appearance.

(c) No individual, other than a licensed physician and surgeon competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the care requested, may deny requests for authorization of health care services pursuant to this section.

(d) No insurer shall do any of the following in providing the coverage described in subdivision (a):

(1) Reduce or limit the reimbursement of the attending provider for providing care to an insured in accordance with the coverage requirements.

(2) Provide monetary or other incentives to an attending provider to induce the provider to provide care to an insured in a manner inconsistent with the coverage requirements.

(3) Provide monetary payments or rebates to an insured to encourage acceptance of less than the coverage requirements.

(e) On or after July 1, 1999, every insurer shall include notice of the coverage required by this section in the insurer’s evidence of coverage or certificate of insurance.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit retrospective utilization review and quality assurance activities by the insurer.

(g) This section shall only apply to health benefit
 plans, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, except that for accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance, coverage for benefits under this section shall apply to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy. Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing a new benefit mandate on accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 449, Sec. 5.   (SB 255)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.861.

(a) A health insurance policy that provides outpatient prescription drug benefits and is issued, amended, or renewed on or after the operative date of this section shall include coverage for United States Food and Drug Administration-approved treatments used to treat menopausal symptoms, as medically necessary, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Hormone therapy, including combination estrogen and hormone medicines, combination estrogen and progestin medicines, estrogen-only and progestin-only medicines, vaginal estrogen, and topical hormone therapy. This does not include glucagon-like peptide-1 or glucagon-like peptide-1 receptor agonists used solely for weight loss.

(2) Low-dose antidepressants.

(3) Anticonvulsants.

(4) Medications to prevent or treat osteoporosis.

(5) Nonhormonal medications for vasomotor-related symptoms.

(b) A health insurance policy that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall include a program to ensure insured individuals have access to current menopause information and covered items and services.

(c) For the program to satisfy subdivision (b), the insurer shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide, no later than July 1, 2027, and biannually thereafter, all contracted providers delivering primary care with information about
 current clinical care recommendations for menopause care, including hormone therapy, from the Menopause Society or other nationally recognized professional association. The insurer shall encourage providers delivering primary care to review the information.

(2) Establish and maintain a policy to reimburse providers for provision of services related to menopause care, including services integrated with primary care and obstetrician-gynecologist services. The policy shall identify the Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) codes for services commonly used to evaluate, diagnose, and treat symptoms resulting from menopause.

(3) Establish and maintain a policy to provide insured individuals who may experience menopause and who are 40 years of age and older with an annual menopause assessment during primary care and obstetrician-gynecologist appointments. Insured individuals may opt out
 of receiving the assessments. The policy shall include a copy of the assessment tool and information on how it was developed or chosen.

(4) Provide insured individuals who may experience menopause and who are 40 years of age and older with a notice that includes a definition of menopause and that lists the covered items and services used to evaluate and treat symptoms resulting from menopause. The first notice shall be sent within 60 days of the insured individual’s 40th birthday and shall be sent biannually thereafter. Insured individuals may opt out of receiving the notices. The notice shall include a description of at least all of the following types of federal Food and Drug Administration-approved items and services:

(A) Hormone therapy in the full range of formulations and methods of administration.

(B) Low-dose
 antidepressants.

(C) Anticonvulsants.

(D) Medications to prevent or treat osteoporosis.

(E) Nonhormonal medications for vasomotor-related symptoms.

(5) Establish and maintain a policy to contract with providers delivering primary care, including advanced practice providers such as licensed nurse practitioners and certified nurse-midwives, who hold a certification or credential in menopause care from a nationally recognized organization, such as the Menopause Society or other similar organization. The policy shall state what steps the insurer will take to incentivize providers to receive and maintain the certification or credential.

(d) The health insurer shall file with the commissioner
 within six months of the operative date of this statute the policies and notices specified in subdivision (c). The insurer shall also disclose the policies to network providers, provider groups, and delegated entities that may be impacted by the policies and notices and shall attest to that disclosure to the commissioner.

(e) Coverage for the treatment options pursuant to this section shall be provided without discrimination on the basis of gender expression or identity.

(f) This section does not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, dental-only, or vision-only insurance policies, except to the extent they provide coverage for the treatment of symptoms resulting from menopause.

(g) For purposes of this section, “menopause” includes perimenopause, menopause, and
 postmenopause.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 56.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.862.

(a) A health insurer shall base a medical necessity determination or the utilization review criteria that the insurer, and an entity acting on the insurer’s behalf, applies to determine the medical necessity of health care services and benefits for the treatment of symptoms resulting from menopause on current generally accepted standards of menopause care.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, when conducting utilization review of all covered health care services and benefits for the treatment of symptoms resulting from menopause, a health insurer shall apply criteria and guidelines developed by the Menopause Society or another nationally recognized professional association, as specified by the commissioner.

(c) In conducting utilization review involving patient care decisions that are within the scope of the sources specified in subdivision (b), a health insurer shall not apply different, additional, conflicting, or more restrictive utilization review criteria than the criteria and guidelines set forth in those sources. This subdivision does not prohibit an insurer from applying utilization review criteria to health care services and benefits for menopause care that meet either of the following criteria:

(1) Are outside the scope of the criteria and guidelines set forth in the sources specified in subdivision (b), if the utilization review criteria were developed in accordance with subdivision (a).

(2) Relate to advancements in technology or types of care that are not covered in the most recent versions of the sources
 specified in subdivision (b), if the utilization review criteria were developed in accordance with subdivision (a).

(d) If a health insurer purchases or licenses utilization review criteria pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (c), the insurer shall verify and document before use that the criteria were developed in accordance with subdivision (a).

(e) A health insurer shall not adopt, impose, or enforce terms in its policies or provider agreements, in writing or in operation, that undermine, alter, or conflict with this section.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Generally accepted standards of menopause care” means standards of care and clinical practice that are generally recognized by health care
 providers practicing in relevant clinical specialties, including gynecology, endocrinology, and family practice. Valid, evidence-based sources establishing generally accepted standards of menopause care include peer reviewed scientific studies and medical literature, clinical practice guidelines and recommendations of nonprofit health care provider professional associations, specialty societies, and federal government agencies, and drug labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(2) “Menopause” includes perimenopause, menopause, and postmenopause.

(3) “Utilization review” means either of the following:

(A) Prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently reviewing and approving, modifying, delaying, or denying, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, requests by health care providers,
 insured individuals, or their authorized representatives for coverage of health care services prior to, retrospectively, or concurrent with the provision of health care services to insured individuals.

(B) Evaluating the medical necessity, appropriateness, or efficacy of health care services, benefits, or procedures, under any circumstances, to determine if a health care service or benefit subject to a medical necessity coverage requirement in a health insurance policy is covered as medically necessary for an insured individual.

(4) “Utilization review criteria” means criteria, standards, protocols, or guidelines used by a health insurer to conduct utilization review.

(g) (1) This section applies to all health care services and benefits for the treatment of symptoms resulting from menopause
 covered by a health insurance policy, including prescription drugs.

(2) This section applies to a health insurer that conducts utilization review and an entity or contracting provider that performs utilization review or utilization management functions on an insurer’s behalf.

(3) This section does not apply to accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, dental-only, or vision-only insurance policies, except to the extent they provide coverage for the treatment of symptoms resulting from menopause.

(h) If the commissioner determines that a health insurer has violated this section, the commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code), by order, assess a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, or, if a violation was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.

(i) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section and Section 10123.861 through guidance or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action, until the department adopts regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act. The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care and interested stakeholders in developing guidance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 57.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.864.

The provision of medically necessary pasteurized donor human milk obtained from a tissue bank licensed pursuant to Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 1635) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code is
 a basic health care service, as described in Sections 10112.27 and 10112.281 and any regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 975, Sec. 4.   (AB 3059)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.865.

(a) Commencing no later than July 1, 2012, an individual health insurance policy shall provide coverage for maternity services for all insureds covered under the policy.

(b) For purposes of this section, “maternity services” include prenatal care, ambulatory care maternity services, involuntary complications of pregnancy, neonatal care, and inpatient hospital maternity care, including labor and delivery and postpartum care. This definition of “maternity services” shall remain in effect until
 the time as federal regulations and guidance issued pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) define the scope of benefits to be provided under the maternity benefit requirement of that act, after which time the definition of that term under the federal act and associated regulations and guidance shall apply for purposes of this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to specialized health insurance, Medicare supplement insurance, CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or TRI-CARE supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, accident-only, or specified disease insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 7.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.866.

(a) Commencing no later than July 1, 2012, a group health insurance policy shall provide coverage for maternity services for all insureds covered under the policy.

(b) For purposes of this section, “maternity services” include prenatal care, ambulatory care maternity services, involuntary complications of pregnancy, neonatal care, and inpatient hospital maternity care, including labor and delivery and postpartum care. This definition of “maternity services” shall remain in effect until
 the time as federal regulations and guidance issued pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) define the scope of benefits to be provided under the maternity benefit requirement of that act, after which time the definition of that term under the federal act and associated regulations and guidance shall apply for purposes of this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to specialized health insurance, Medicare supplement insurance, CHAMPUS supplement insurance, or TRI-CARE supplement insurance, or to hospital indemnity, accident-only, or specified disease insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 687, Sec. 8.   (SB 910)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.867.

(a) A health insurer shall develop a maternal mental health program designed to promote quality and cost-effective outcomes. The program shall consist of at least one maternal mental health screening to be conducted during pregnancy, at least one additional screening to be conducted during the first six weeks
 of the postpartum period, and additional postpartum screenings, if determined to be medically necessary and clinically appropriate in the judgment of the treating provider. The program shall be developed consistent with sound clinical principles and processes, and shall include quality measures to encourage screening, diagnosis, treatment, and referral. The program guidelines and criteria shall be provided to relevant medical providers, including all contracting obstetric providers. As part of the maternal mental health program, a health insurer is encouraged to improve screening, treatment, and referral to maternal mental health services, include coverage for doulas, incentivize training opportunities for contracting obstetric providers, and educate insureds about the program.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Contracting obstetric provider” means an individual who is certified or licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or an initiative act referred to in that division, and who is contracted with the insured’s health insurer to provide services under the insured’s health insurance policy.

(2) “Maternal mental health” means a mental health condition that occurs during pregnancy or during the postpartum period and includes, but is not limited to, postpartum depression.

(c) This section does not apply to specialized health insurers, except behavioral health-only
 insurers that provide coverage for professional mental health services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 815, Sec. 2.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.868.

On or before January 1, 2025, a health insurer shall develop a maternal and infant health equity program that addresses racial health disparities in maternal and infant health outcomes through the use of doulas. This may be achieved by integrating the program into existing maternal mental health programs, including those encouraging the coverage of doula care, or by expanding existing doula programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 349, Sec. 3.   (AB 904)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.869.

(a) A contract between a health insurer and a health care provider issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, shall authorize a provider to separately bill for devices, implants, or professional services, or a combination thereof, associated with immediate postpartum contraception if the birth takes place in a general acute care hospital or licensed birth center. The provider contract shall not consider those devices, implants, or services to be part of a payment for a general obstetric procedure.

(b) For purposes of this section, “immediate postpartum contraception” means the postpartum insertion of intrauterine devices or contraceptive implants performed before the insured is discharged from the general acute care hospital or licensed birth center and includes the devices or implants themselves.

(c) This section does not affect an insured’s right to directly access women’s health care services, including contraceptive services, and informed consent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 950, Sec. 2.   (AB 2129)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.87.

(a) No individual or group policy of disability insurance that provides coverage for hospital, medical, and surgical benefits that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after the effective date of the act adding this section, that provides maternity coverage, shall do any of the following:

(1) Restrict benefits for inpatient hospital care to a time period less than 48 hours following a normal vaginal delivery and less than 96 hours following a delivery by caesarean section. However, coverage for inpatient hospital care may be for a time period less than 48 or 96 hours if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The decision to discharge the mother and newborn before the 48- or 96-hour time period is made by the treating physicians in consultation with the mother.

(B) The policy covers a postdischarge followup visit for the mother and newborn within 48 hours of discharge, when prescribed by the treating physician. The visit shall be provided by a licensed health care provider whose scope of practice includes postpartum care and newborn care. The visit shall include, at a minimum, parent education, assistance and training in breast or bottle feeding, and the performance of any necessary maternal or neonatal physical assessments. The treating physician shall disclose to the mother the availability of a postdischarge visit, including an in-home visit, physician office visit, or a visit to a facility under contract with the insurer. The treating physician, in consultation with the mother, shall determine whether the postdischarge visit shall occur at home, the contracted facility, or the treating physician’s office after assessment of certain factors. These factors shall include, but not be limited to, the transportation needs of the family, and environmental and social risks.

(2) Reduce or limit the reimbursement of the attending provider for providing care to an individual insured in accordance with the coverage requirements.

(3) Provide monetary or other incentives to an attending provider to induce the provider to provide care to an individual insured in a manner inconsistent with the coverage requirements.

(4) Deny a mother or her newborn eligibility, or continued eligibility, to enroll or to renew coverage solely to avoid the coverage requirements.

(5) Provide monetary payments or rebates to a mother to encourage her to accept less than the minimum coverage requirements.

(6) Restrict inpatient benefits for the second day of hospital care in a manner that is less than favorable to the mother or her newborn than those provided during the preceding portion of the hospital stay.

(7) Require the treating physician to obtain authorization from the insurer prior to prescribing any services covered by this section.

(b) (1) Every individual or group policy of disability insurance that provides coverage for hospital, medical, and surgical benefits shall include notice of the coverage specified in subdivision (a) in the insurer’s evidence of coverage or certificate of insurance for evidences of coverage or certificates of insurance issued on or after January 1, 1998.

(2) Every insurer that issues a policy of disability insurance under paragraph (1) shall provide additional written notice to all females between the ages of 10 and 50 who are covered under those policies of the coverage under subdivision (a) within 60 days of the effective date of this act. The insurer shall provide additional written notice of the coverage specified in subdivision (a) during the course of prenatal care if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The insurer previously notified policyholders that hospital stays for delivery would be inconsistent with the requirement in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) The insurer received notice, whether by receipt of a claim, a request for preauthorization for pregnancy-related services, or other actual notice that the insured is pregnant.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an insurer from negotiating the level and type of reimbursement with a provider for care provided in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 798, Sec. 3.   Effective October 9, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.88.

(a) Every policy of health insurance covering hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered in this state on or after July 1, 1999, shall cover reconstructive surgery, as defined in subdivision (c), that is necessary to achieve the purposes specified in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a policy to provide coverage for cosmetic surgery, as defined in subdivision (d). This section shall only apply to health benefit plans, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, except that for accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance, coverage for benefits under this section shall apply to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general
 terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy. Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing a new benefit mandate on accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance.

(b) No individual, other than a licensed physician competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the care requested, may deny initial requests for authorization of coverage for treatment pursuant to this section. For a treatment authorization request submitted by a podiatrist or an oral and maxillofacial surgeon, the request may be reviewed by a similarly licensed individual, competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the care requested.
